Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-2008
Public Counsel; particular administrative acts; review.

(1) In selecting matters for attention, the Public Counsel shall particularly review an administrative act that might be:

(a) Contrary to law or regulation;

(b) Unreasonable, unfair, oppressive, or inconsistent with the general course of an administrative agency's judgments;

(c) Mistaken in law or arbitrary in ascertainments of fact;

(d) Improper in motivation or based on irrelevant considerations;

(e) Unclear or inadequately explained when reasons should have been revealed; or

(f) Inefficiently performed.

(2) The Public Counsel may also work to strengthen procedures and practices which lessen the risk that objectionable administrative acts will occur.

Laws 1969, c. 762, § 7, p. 2881;

Laws 2020, LB1144, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-8,246;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 8.